sv: Monteringsgränssnitt för whorl: Integrerad remskiva; Kilad axel; Tryckpassning; Snabblås; Stoppskruv; Gängad; Övrigt
hr-HR: Sučelje za montažu vretena: Integrirana kolotura; Osovina s klinom; Push-fit; Za brzo otpuštanje; Zatik; S navojem; Ostalo
en: Whorl mounting interface: Integrated pulley; Keyed shaft; Push-fit; Quick-release; Set screw; Threaded; Other
bg-BG: Интерфейс за монтаж на вретено: Интегрирана макара; Шпонков вал; С притискане; Бързо освобождаване; Фиксиращ винт; С резба; Друго
zh-TW: 紡輪安裝介面: 整合式滑輪; 鍵槽軸; 推入式配合; 快拆; 止付螺絲; 螺紋; 其他
el: Διεπαφή στερέωσης σφονδύλου: Ενσωματωμένη τροχαλία; Άξονας με σφήνα; Κουμπωτή προσαρμογή; Ταχεία απασφάλιση; Βίδα σύσφιγξης; Με σπείρωμα; Άλλο
zh-CN: 锭盘安装接口: 一体式皮带轮; 键轴; 推入式; 快拆式; 定位螺钉; 螺纹; 其他
cs: Rozhraní pro montáž přeslenu: Integrovaná řemenice; Hřídel s perem; Nalisované; Rychloupínací; Stavěcí šroub; Závitové; Jiné
ro-RO: Interfață de montare a rotiței de fus: Fulie integrată; Arbore cu pană; Montare prin presare; Eliberare rapidă; Șurub de fixare; Filetat; Altele
fi: Kehrän asennusliitäntä: Integroitu hihnapyörä; Kiilattu akseli; Työntösovite; Pikalukitus; Pidätinruuvi; Kierteistetty; Muu
th: ส่วนต่อประสานการติดตั้งแบบเกลียว: พูลเลย์ในตัว; เพลาร่องลิ่ม; ข้อต่อแบบสวม; ปลดเร็ว; สกรูตัวหนอน; แบบเกลียว; อื่นๆ
hu: Karika rögzítési felülete: Beépített szíjtárcsa; Ékelt tengely; Rápattintós; Gyorskioldós; Hernyócsavaros; Menetes; Egyéb
sk-SK: Montážne rozhranie závitu: Integrovaná kladka; Hriadeľ s perom; Násuvné; Rýchloupínacie; Nastavovacia skrutka; Závitové; Iné
ru: Интерфейс крепления мутовки: Интегрированный шкив; Вал со шпонкой; Насадка с натягом; Быстросъемное; Установочный винт; Резьбовое; Другое
es: Interfaz de montaje del huso: Polea integrada; Eje con chaveta; Ajuste a presión; Liberación rápida; Tornillo de fijación; Roscado; Otro
nb: Monteringsgrensesnitt for spinnehjul: Integrert trinse; Kileaksel; Trykkpasning; Hurtigkobling; Setteskrue; Gjenget; Annet
tr: Fırdöndü montaj arayüzü: Entegre makara; Kavela milli; Geçmeli; Hızlı çıkarılabilir; Ayar vidası; Dişli; Diğer
lt-LT: Verpimo svarelių montavimo sąsaja: Integruotas skriemulys; Velenas su pleištu; Užmaunama; Greito atleidimo; Fiksavimo varžtas; Srieginė; Kita
pt-BR: Interface da montagem em espiral: Polia integrada; Eixo chavetado; Encaixe por pressão; Engate rápido; Parafuso de fixação; Rosqueado; Outra
pl: Interfejs montażowy przęślika: Zintegrowane koło pasowe; Wał z wpustem; Wciskane; Szybkozłączka; Śruba dociskowa; Gwintowane; Inny
fr: Interface de montage en spirale: Poulie intégrée; Arbre claveté; À emboîtement; À dégagement rapide; Vis de pression; Filetée; Autre
ko: 휘를 장착 인터페이스: 일체형 도르래; 키드 샤프트; 푸시 핏; 퀵 릴리스; 세트 스크루; 나사형; 기타
de: Anbringungsweise des Spinnwirtels: Integrierte Riemenscheibe; Passfederwelle; Steckverbindung; Schnellverschluss; Stellschraube; Gewinde; Andere
it: Interfaccia di montaggio del fusaiolo: Puleggia integrata; Albero con chiavetta; Montaggio a pressione; Sgancio rapido; Vite di fermo; Filettata; Altro
vi: Giao diện gắn đĩa xoay sợi: Ròng rọc tích hợp; Trục có rãnh then; Lắp bằng lực đẩy; Tháo lắp nhanh; Vít cấy; Có ren; Khác
pt-PT: Interface de montagem do disco de fiar: Polia integrada; Veio com chaveta; Encaixe por pressão; Libertação rápida; Parafuso de fixação; Roscado; Outro
sl-SI: Vmesnik za montažo vztrajnika: Vgrajen škripec; Gred z zatičem; Na potisk; Hitra sprostitev; Nastavitveni vijak; Z navojem; Drugo
ja: 渦巻きマウントインターフェース: 一体型プーリー; キー付きシャフト; プッシュフィット; クイックリリース; 止めねじ; ねじ山付き; その他
da: Monteringsgrænseflade for ten: Integreret remskive; Kileaksel; Push-fit; Quick-release; Pinolskrue; Med gevind; Andet
nl: Type spoelbevestiging: Geïntegreerde katrol; Spie-as; Klembevestiging / Push-fit; Snelsluiting; Stelschroef; Schroefdraad; Overig